District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

26-603

Fees credited to the special account.

Repealed.

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1804(1), 44 DCR 7378
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1902(c), 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1411(a), 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, §§ 601(b), 602(a), 49 DCR 2551
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 36, 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 26-802.4.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 14-86, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001”, effective March 19, 2002, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 14-86 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary addition of sections, see notes following § 26-602.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 1502(c) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794) and § 1502(c) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 601(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).

Application of Law 12-60: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 26-602.

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 26-601.